Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4309.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 451 of Title 3A, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Electronic
Pull-Tab Device Act".
Req. No. 15646 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 452 of Title 3A, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Each electronic pull-tab device shall bear a seal approved
by the Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement (ABLE) Commission.
B. An electronic pull-tab device shall not be capable of being
used for the purpose of engaging in any game prohibited by the
Commission.
C. In addition to a video monitor or touch screen, each
electronic pull-tab device may include, but not be limited to, a
bill acceptor, printer, and electromechanical buttons for activating
the game and providing player input, including a means for the
player to make selections and choices in games.
D. For each electronic pull-tab device, there shall be located
anywhere within the distributed pull-tab system, nonvolatile memory
or its equivalent. The memory shall be maintained in a secure
location for the purpose of storing and preserving a set of critical
data that has been error-checked in accordance with the critical
memory requirements of this regulation.
E. An electronic pull-tab device shall not have any switches,
jumpers, wire posts, or other means of manipulation that could
affect the operation or outcome of a game. The electronic pull-tab
device may not have any functions or parameters adjustable through

Req. No. 15646 Page 2

any separate video display or input codes except for the adjustment
of features that are wholly cosmetic.
F. An electronic pull-tab device shall not have any of the
following attributes:
1. Spinning or mechanical reels;
2. Pull handle;
3. Sounds or music solely intended to entice a player to play;
4. Flashing lights or tower light;
5. Top box, coin tray, ticket acceptance, hopper, coin
acceptor;
6. Enhanced animation, cabinet, or payglass artwork; or
7. Any other attribute identified by the Commission.
G. An electronic pull-tab device shall be robust enough to
withstand forced illegal entry that would leave behind physical
evidence of the attempted entry or such entry that causes an error
code that is displayed and transmitted to the distributed pull-tab
system. Any such entry attempt shall inhibit game play until
cleared and shall not affect the subsequent play or any other play,
prize, or aspect of the game.
H. The number of electronic pull-tab devices, other than those
electronic pull-tab devices that are handheld, present at any
premises at which charitable gaming is conducted shall be limited to
ten devices. The Commission shall determine whether an electronic
pull-tab device is handheld.
Req. No. 15646 Page 3

I. The ABLE Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to
implement and enforce the provisions of the Electronic Pull-Tab
Device Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 402, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 402. As used in the Oklahoma Charity Games Act, Section
401 et seq. of this title, and the Electronic Pull-Tab Device Act,
created in Section 1 of this act:
1. "Bingo" means a game in which each player receives a bingo
face and covers the squares according to the numbers, letters, or
combination of numbers and letters that have been announced by the
caller. The numbers and letters called are on an object selected at
random either manually or mechanically from a receptacle in which
have been placed the objects bearing the numbers, letters, or
combinations of numbers and letters corresponding to the system used
for designating the bingo face squares. The winner of each bingo
game is the player who first properly covers a predetermined and
announced pattern of squares upon the bingo face being used by the
player;
2. "Bingo face" means a flat piece of paper which is marked off
into any number of squares in any arrangement of rows, with each
square being designated by number, letter or combination of numbers
and letters and with one or more squares designated as a "free"
space with the word "Oklahoma" and a facsimile outline of a map of
Req. No. 15646 Page 4

Okla homa in it, which cannot be reused after the game in which a
player has used it is over;
3. "Breakopen ticket card" means a single folded or banded
ticket or a card, the face of which is initially covered or
otherwise hidden from view to conceal a number, letter, symbol, or
set of letters or symbols, a few of which numbers, letters or
symbols out of every set of charity game tickets have been
designated in advance at random as prize winners and which is used
in a breakopen ticket game;
4. "Breakopen ticket game" means a game wherein a player
receives a breakopen ticket card. A breakopen ticket game shall
meet the following criteria:
a. the game shall be assembled so that no placement of
winners or losers exists that allows the possibility
of prize manipulation,
b. the concealed numbers, letters, or symbols shall not
be visible from the outside of the game using high
intensity lamps. Protection shall be provided by the
opaque paper stock employed, with the possible
addition of colors and printed blockout patterns or by
use of an aluminum foil laminate,
c. a unique symbol or printed security device, such as a
specific number keyed to particular winners or the
name of the symbol or some of the symbol colors
Req. No. 15646 Page 5

changed for a window, or other similar protection
shall be placed in the winning windows of prize
windows to ensure that the winner image is unique,
d. it shall not be possible to detect or pick out winning
from losing tickets through variations in printing
graphics, color, or use of different printing plates,
e. it shall not be possible to isolate winning or
potential winning tickets from minor variations in
size or cutting of the tickets comprising a particular
packet, and
f. each ticket in a game shall have a serial number. All
tickets in a game shall have the same serial number
appearing in a conspicuous place on the ticket;
5. "Business entity" means a person, company, corporation, or
partnership organized for profit;
6. "Charity game" means a bingo game, U-PIK-EM bingo game, or
breakopen ticket game conducted by an organization pursuant to the
provisions of the Oklahoma Charity Games Act;
7. "Charity game equipment" means any object uniquely designed
for use in the conducting of a charity game including, but not
limited to, bingo faces, U-PIK-EM bingo game sets, and breakopen
ticket cards. Items used in conducting charity games which are not
charity game equipment are ink markers, furniture and general
furnishings of rooms where charity games are conducted;
Req. No. 15646 Page 6

8. "Commission" or "ABLE Commission" means the Alcoholic
Beverage Laws Enforcement Commission;
9. "Day session" means the set time frame within which
conducting of charity games is authorized beginning no earlier than
10:00 a.m. and ending no later than 5:00 p.m.;
10. "Deal" means one series of breakopen ticket game cards
which has a stated number of winner payouts and a stated amount of
the payouts;
11. "Distributor" means a person or business entity that sells,
markets, or otherwise provides charity game equipment to an
organization;
12. "Doing business" means either conducting a charity game by
an organization or providing goods or services to an organization by
a business entity;
13. "Electronic pull-tab device" means an electronic device
that displays an instant result from a pull-tab game by utilizing a
touchscreen monitor. The device accumulates winnings for the player
and prints out a voucher at the conclusion of play that can be
redeemed for cash or credited to use on another electronic pull-tab
device for continued play;
13. 14. "Employee" means a person who works for compensation in
a licensed charity game establishment;
14. 15. "Immediate family member" means a spouse, parent, child
or sibling or spouse of a parent, child or sibling of a resident of
Req. No. 15646 Page 7

a fa cility exempt from specific provisions of the Oklahoma Charity
Games Act as provided in subsection C of Section 405 of this title;
15. 16. "Licensee" means any person, organization, or business
entity which has received a license from the Commission;
16. 17. "Location" means the building, including the individual
rooms and equipment in the rooms, grounds, and appurtenances,
including adjacent premises if subject to the direct or indirect
control of the organization while conducting a charity game, which
are used in connection with or in furtherance of the conducting of a
charity game;
17. 18. "Manager" means a person who:
a. is an employee of an organization,
b. has supervisory authority over other employees or over
the conduct of charity games, and
c. has been designated as such by the organization
pursuant to the provisions of subsection D of Section
408 of this title;
18. 19. "Manufacturer" means a person or business entity that
assembles from raw materials, supplies, or subparts to form a
completed series of charity game equipment for use in charity games
and that sells, markets, or otherwise provides such equipment to a
distributor;


Req. No. 15646 Page 8

19. 20. "Night session" means the set time frame within which
conducting of charity games is authorized beginning no earlier than
5:00 p.m. and ending no later than 12:00 p.m. a.m. midnight;
20. 21. "Organization" means a religious, charitable, labor,
fraternal, educational, or other type of association or any branch,
lodge, chapter, or auxiliary of such association which:
a. operates without profit to its members,
b. has been in existence and been operating as a
nonprofit organization for not less than two (2) years
prior to applying for an organization license,
c. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of
paragraphs (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), or
(19) of subsection (c) of Section 501 or paragraph (1)
of subsection (a) of Section 509 of the United States
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 501(c) et seq. or Section 509(a)(1), and
d. formulates bylaws which clearly identify and
establish:
(1) method of electing officers and their duties,
(2) method by which members are elected, initiated or
admitted,
(3) the rights and privileges of each member,
(4) that each member has one vote, and

Req. No. 15646 Page 9

(5) that membership rights are personal to the member
and not assignable;
21. 22. "Progressive game" means a game in which prizes are
allowed to be carried over and increased from session to session;
22. 23. "U-PIK-EM bingo game" means a game played wherein a
player writes the numbers on a U-PIK-EM bingo game set. The player
retains one sheet of the set and deposits the second sheet in a
receptacle in the control of the organization. The player then
covers the numbers as the caller announces a number. The numbers
called are on an object selected at random either manually or
mechanically from a receptacle in which have been placed the objects
bearing the numbers. The winner of each U-PIK-EM bingo game is the
player who first covers all the numbers appearing on the retained
sheet in accordance with the pattern as designated on the sheet; and
23. 24. "U-PIK-EM bingo game set" means two paper sheets of
carbonless paper both bearing identical serial numbers on which a
player writes numbers or letters, wherein one sheet is retained by
the player and used for playing and one sheet is held by the
organization and used for verifying winners.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15646 CMA 12/12/25


Req. No. 15646 Page 10